Georgia, session 2025_26, HB430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Title 42 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
Sexual Offender Risk Review Board, is amended by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (h)
of Code Section 42-1-12, relating to State Sexual Offender Registry, as follows:
"(2) The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall:
(A) Transmit all information, including the conviction data and fingerprints, to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation within 24 hours of entering the data;
(B) Establish operating policies and procedures concerning record ownership, quality,
verification, modification, and cancellation; and
(C) Perform mail out and verification duties as follows:
H. B. 430
- 1 -

LC 48 1467
(i) Send each month Criminal Justice Information System network messages to
sheriffs listing sexual offenders due for verification;
(ii) Create a photo image file from original entries and provide such entries to sheriffs
to assist in sexual offender identification and verification;
(iii) Mail a nonforwardable verification form to the last reported address of the sexual
offender within ten days prior to the sexual offender's birthday;
(iv) If the sexual offender changes residence to another state, notify the law
enforcement agency with which the sexual offender shall register in the new state; and
(v) Maintain records required under this Code section; and
(D) Review the conviction or convictions of a nonresident who changes residence from
another state or territory of the United States or any other place to Georgia to determine
whether said nonresident should be subject to the registration requirements set forth in
subsection (e) of this Code section, and if applicable, place such nonresident on the
state sexual offender registry."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (b), paragraph (2) of
subsection (d), and subsections (e) and (f) of Code Section 42-1-19, relating to petition for
release from registration requirements, as follows:
"(2) Such petition shall be served on the district attorney of the jurisdiction where the
petition is filed, the sheriff of the county where the petition is filed, and the sheriff of the
county where the individual resides, the sheriff of the county of the individual's intended
residence, and the chief superior court judge of the county of the individual's intended
residence. Service on the district attorney and sheriff may be had by mailing a copy of
the petition with a proper certificate of service."
"(2) Any evidence introduced by the district attorney, board, or sheriff sheriffs; and"
H. B. 430
- 2 -

LC 48 1467
"(e) The court shall hold a hearing on the petition if requested by the petitioner, the sheriff
of the county where the petition is filed, the sheriff of the county where the individual
resides, or the sheriff of the county of the individual's intended residence.
(f) The court may issue an order releasing the individual from registration requirements
or residency or employment restrictions, in whole or part, if the court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that the individual does not pose a substantial risk of
perpetrating any future dangerous sexual offense. The court may release an individual
from such requirements or restrictions for a specific period of time. The court shall send
a copy of any order releasing an individual from any requirements or restrictions to the
sheriff and the district attorney of the jurisdiction where the petition is filed, to the sheriff
of the county where the individual resides, to the sheriff of the county of the individual's
intended residence, to the Department of Corrections, to the Department of Community
Supervision, and to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 430
- 3 -